Nebraska, session 109, LB77A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $500,000 from the Department
of Insurance Cash Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $500,000 from the Department of
Insurance Cash Fund for FY2026-27 to the Department of Insurance, for Program
69, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 77, One Hundred
Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
-1-